Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1267.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 2002, as

amended by Section 2, Chapter 327, O.S.L. 2025 (22 O.S. Supp. 2025,

Section 2002), is amended to read as follows:

Section 2002. A. Disclosure of Evidence by the State.

1. Upon request of the defense, the The state shall disclose to

the defense the following:

a. the names and addresses of witnesses which that the

state intends to call at trial, together with their



Req. No. 2238 Page 1

relevant, written or recorded statement, if any, or if

none, significant summaries of any oral statement,

b. any law enforcement reports, offense reports,

supplemental reports, body-worn camera footage,

dashcam footage, and 9-1-1 audio recordings made in

connection with the particular case in the form or

forms in which such evidence is ordinarily maintained

or in a reasonably usable form,

c. any written or recorded statements and the substance

of any oral statements made by the accused or made by

a codefendant,

d. any reports or statements made by experts in

connection with the particular case, including results

of physical or mental examinations and of scientific

tests, experiments, or comparisons, including, but not

limited to, preliminary reports, screening results,

and analyses performed or stored electronically, and

the underlying raw data, documentation, testing

protocols, and laboratory validation studies used to

generate any report in their native format where

feasible,

e. any books, papers, documents, photographs, tangible

objects, buildings, or places which that the

prosecuting attorney intends to use in the hearing or

Req. No. 2238 Page 2

trial or which that were obtained from or belong to

the accused,

f. any record of prior criminal convictions of the

defendant, or of any codefendant, and

g. Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation (OSBI) rap

sheet/records sheet or records check on any witness

listed by the state or the defense as a witness who

will testify at trial, as well as any convictions of

any witness revealed through additional record checks

if the defense has furnished Social Security numbers

or date of birth for their witnesses a witness, except

OSBI rap sheet/record sheet or record checks shall not

provide date of birth, Social Security number, home

phone number, or home address.

2. The state shall provide the defendant any evidence favorable

to the defendant if such evidence is material to either guilt or

punishment.

3. The prosecuting attorney’s obligations under this standard

extend to:

a. material and information in the possession or control

of members of the prosecutor’s staff,

b. any information in the possession of law enforcement

agencies that regularly report to the prosecutor of

which the prosecutor should reasonably know, and

Req. No. 2238 Page 3

c. any information in the possession of law enforcement

agencies who have reported to the prosecutor with

reference to the particular case of which the

prosecutor should reasonably know.

4. a. If the state intends to introduce testimony of a

jailhouse an informant, the state shall disclose at

least ten (10) thirty (30) days prior to trial:

(1) the complete criminal history of such the

informant, including any dismissed charges,

(2) any deal, promise, inducement, or benefit that

the state or law enforcement agency has made or

may make in the future to the jailhouse informant

in connection with the testimony of such the

informant,

(3) the specific statements or recordings made by the

suspect or defendant and the time, place, and

manner of the disclosure to the jailhouse

informant,

(4) all other filed cases in which the state intended

to introduce the testimony of the jailhouse

informant in connection with a deal, promise,

inducement, or benefit, the nature of the deal,

promise, inducement, or benefit, and whether the

testimony was admitted in the case,

Req. No. 2238 Page 4

(5) whether at any time the jailhouse informant

recanted the testimony or statement, and if so, a

transcript or copy of such recantation, if any,

and

(6) any other information relevant to the credibility

of the informant.

b. Each district attorney’s office shall maintain a

central record that tracks each case in which the

state intended to introduce the testimony of the

jailhouse informant against a suspect or defendant in

connection with a deal, promise, inducement, or

benefit, the nature of the deal, promise, inducement,

or benefit and whether such testimony or statements

were admitted in the case. Such record shall be sent

to the District Attorneys Council which shall maintain

a statewide record of such information. Records

maintained pursuant to this paragraph subparagraph

shall only be accessible to prosecutors and shall not

be subject to the Oklahoma Open Records Act. By

September 15 of each year, the District Attorneys

Council shall publish an annual report of aggregate,

de-identified data regarding the total number of cases

tracked pursuant to this section, and the number of

cases added during the previous fiscal year pursuant

Req. No. 2238 Page 5

to this section by each district attorney’s office. A

copy of the report shall be distributed electronically

to the Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the

Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives,

and the chairs of the Senate and House Judiciary

Committees.

c. For purposes of this paragraph, “jailhouse informant”

“informant” means a person who provides, or who the

prosecutor intends to provide, testimony about

admissions or other relevant information made to him

or her by the suspect or defendant while both persons

were detained or incarcerated in a penal institution

the custody of the Department of Corrections.

Informant shall also include a person who provides, or

who the prosecutor intends to provide, testimony about

admissions or other relevant information pursuant to a

deal, promise, inducement, or benefit between the

person and the state.

B. Disclosure of Evidence by the Defendant.

1. Upon request of the state, the defense shall be required to

disclose the following:

a. the names and addresses of witnesses which that the

defense intends to call at trial, together with their



Req. No. 2238 Page 6

relevant, written or recorded statement, if any, or if

none, significant summaries of any oral statement,

b. the name and address of any witness, other than the

defendant, who will be called to show that the

defendant was not present at the time and place

specified in the information or indictment, together

with the witness’ statement to that fact, and

c. the names and addresses of any witness the defendant

will call, other than himself or herself, for

testimony relating to any mental disease, mental

defect, or other condition bearing upon his or her

mental state at the time the offense was allegedly

committed, together with the witness’ statement of

that fact, if the statement is redacted by the court

to preclude disclosure of privileged communication.

2. A statement filed under subparagraph a, b, or c of paragraph

1 of this subsection or subsection A or B of this section is not

admissible in evidence at trial. Information obtained as a result

of a statement filed under this subsection or subsection A or B of

this section is not admissible in evidence at trial except to refute

the testimony of a witness whose identity subsection A of this

section requires to be disclosed.

3. Upon the prosecuting attorney’s request after the time set

by the court, the defendant shall allow him or her access at any

Req. No. 2238 Page 7

reas onable times and in any reasonable manner to inspect,

photograph, copy, or have reasonable tests made upon any book,

paper, document, photograph, or tangible object which that is within

the defendant’s possession or control and which that:

a. the defendant intends to offer in evidence, except to

the extent that it contains any communication of the

defendant, or

b. is a report or statement as to a physical or mental

examination or scientific test or experiment made in

connection with the particular case prepared by and

relating to the anticipated testimony of a person whom

the defendant intends to call as a witness, provided

the report or statement is redacted by the court to

preclude disclosure of privileged communication.

4. With respect to each expert the defense intends to call as a

witness at the hearing, the defense shall provide to the state a

curriculum vitae and written description of the substance of the

proposed testimony of the expert, the expert’s opinion, and the

underlying basis for that opinion. If the substance of the proposed

testimony, the expert’s opinion, and the basis of that opinion are

contained in a disclosed expert report, the defense shall not be

required to provide a written description.

C. Continuing Duty to Disclose.



Req. No. 2238 Page 8

If, prior to or during trial, a party discovers additional

evidence or material previously requested or ordered, which is

subject to discovery or inspection under the Oklahoma Criminal

Discovery Code, such party shall promptly notify the other party,

the attorney of the other party, or the court of the existence of

the additional evidence or material.

D. Time of Discovery.

1. Motions for discovery may be made at the time of or after

the district court arraignment or thereafter; provided that requests

for police reports may be made subject to the provisions of Section

258 of this title. However, a request pursuant to Section 258 of

this title shall be subject to the discretion of the district

attorney. All issues relating to discovery, except as otherwise

provided, will be completed at least ten (10) thirty (30) days prior

to trial. The court may specify the time, place, and manner of

making the discovery and may prescribe such terms and conditions as

are just.

2. Within thirty (30) days of the filing of an endorsed

complaint, indictment, or information in a court of record, law

enforcement shall provide to the prosecuting agency the following

records, if such records exist:

a. body camera videos at the time of arrest,

b. vehicle-mounted camera videos at the time of arrest,

and

Req. No. 2238 Page 9

c. a recording of the administration of a sobriety test.

3. Within ninety (90) days of the filing of an endorsed

complaint, indictment, or information, the prosecuting agency shall

make available the records described in paragraph 2 of this

subsection to the defendant or his or her representative.

4. Failure of a law enforcement agency to comply with the

provisions of paragraph 2 of this subsection may be punished by

contempt.

5. The following information may be redacted by the prosecuting

agency from the records provided to a defendant or his or her

representative as required by the provisions of paragraph 3 of this

subsection; provided that, notice of such redactions are given to

the defendant or to his or her representative:

a. information that would violate any requirement to keep

certain juvenile records confidential as provided for

in Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes,

b. information that would materially compromise an

ongoing criminal investigation or ongoing criminal

prosecution other than the case involving the

defendant,

c. information that would undermine the assertion of a

privilege to keep the identity of an informant

confidential as provided for in Section 2510 of Title

12 of the Oklahoma Statutes,

Req. No. 2238 Page 10

d. information that would identify any person who

provides information to law enforcement or the

information provided by that person when that person

requests anonymity or where disclosure of the identity

of the person or the information provided could

reasonably be expected to threaten or endanger the

physical safety or property of the person or the

physical safety or property of others, or

e. require production of records or videos that fall

outside the scope permitted under the provisions of

paragraph 2 of this subsection.

E. Regulation of Discovery.

1. Protective and Modifying Orders. Upon motion of the state

or defendant, the court may at any time order that specified

disclosures be restricted, or make any other protective order. If

the court enters an order restricting specified disclosures, the

entire text of the material restricted shall be sealed and preserved

in the records of the court to be made available to the appellate

court in the event of an appeal.

2. Failure to Comply with a Request. If at any time during the

course of the proceedings it is brought to the attention of the

court that a party has failed to comply with this rule, the court

may order such party to permit the discovery or inspection, grant

continuance, or prohibit the party from introducing evidence not

Req. No. 2238 Page 11

disc losed, or it may enter such other order as it deems just under

the circumstances.

3. The discovery order shall not include discovery of legal

work product of either attorney which that is deemed to include

legal research or those portions of records, correspondence,

reports, or memoranda which that are only the opinions, theories, or

conclusions of the attorney or the attorney’s legal staff.

F. Reasonable cost of copying, duplicating, videotaping,

developing, or any other cost associated with this Code for items

requested shall be paid by the party so requesting party; however,

any item which that was obtained from the defendant by the state of

which copies are requested by the defendant shall be paid by the

state. Provided, if the court determines the defendant is indigent

and without funds to pay the cost of reproduction of the required

items, the cost shall be paid by the Oklahoma Indigent Defender

Defense System, unless otherwise provided by law.

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.



60-2-2238 BLB 12/17/2025 1:46:26 PM











Req. No. 2238 Page 12